Hawaii, session 2026, SB3267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201B-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (b) to read: "(b) The authority shall be headed by an advisory board of directors that shall consist of [twelve] seven members; provided that: (1)  The members shall be appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34, except as provided by this section; (2)  The members shall include at least one representative each from the city and county of Honolulu and the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui; [(3)  One member shall be appointed by the president of the senate, and one member shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (4)  At least six members shall have knowledge, experience, and expertise in the area of accommodations, transportation, retail, entertainment, or attractions, and at least one member appointed by the governor shall have knowledge, experience, and expertise in the area of Hawaiian cultural practices; (5)  At least one member shall represent a tourism-impacted entity; (6)  The governor shall make appointments to ensure the fulfillment of all requirements of paragraphs (2) and (4); provided that upon the occurrence of a vacancy subject to paragraph (3), the governor shall notify the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives of any unfulfilled requirements pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (4), and the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, as appropriate, shall appoint a member who fulfills those requirements; and (7)  No person who has served as a member of the board of directors of the Hawaii Visitors and Convention Bureau shall be eligible to sit as a member of the board of directors of the Hawaii tourism authority until at least two years have expired between the person's termination from service on the Hawaii Visitors and Convention Bureau board and the person's appointment to the authority's board of directors.] (3)  One member shall be appointed from a list provided by The Hawaii Lodging and Tourism Association; (4)  One member shall be appointed from a list provided by the Hawaii Hotel Alliance; (5)  One member shall be appointed from a list provided by the Hawaii State and Local Government Affairs Committee of Airlines for America; (6)  One member shall be appointed from a list provided by the Activities & Attractions Association of Hawaii, Inc.; (7)  One member shall be appointed from a list provided by the Hawaii Restaurant Association; (8)  One member shall be appointed from a list provided by the Retail Merchants of Hawaii, Inc.; and (9)  One member shall be appointed from a list provided by the Cruise Lines International Association, Inc." 2.  By amending subsection (e) to read: "(e) [Seven] Four members shall constitute a quorum and a minimum of [seven] four affirmative votes shall be necessary for all actions by the authority.  The members shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including traveling expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________